apertium-tr-tt.tt.lexc
LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASE ;                 ! -ым/-ем, -м
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASE ;                 ! -ың/-ең, -ң
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE ;        ! -ы/е, -сы/-се
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з CASE ;           ! -ыбыз/-ебез, -быз/-без
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}з CASE ;       ! -ыгыз/-егез, -гыз/-гез

CASE ;

! In dative nouns with <px1sg> <px2sg> and <px3sp> gets an "-a" ending instead of "-га/-гә, -ка/-кә". Like it is in Turkish
! In nouns with <px3sp> there is an enclitic "н" in most cases  
!! китабым      китабың	        китабы
!! китабымның   китабыңның      китабының
!! китабыма!    китабыңа!       китабы-н-а!     
!! китабымны    китабыңны       китабы-н           ! китабы-н-ы is an old form. Only in poetry :)
!! китабымнан   китабыңнан      китабы-н-нан
!! китабымда    китабыңда       китабы-н-да

LEXICON POSS

%<px%>:%>н%{I%}к%{I%}{n} CASE ;       !! -ныкы/-неке in Tatar   !! FIXME: this can appear after possessives too
                                                             !! e.g. бала-лар-ым-ныкы "of my children"
POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON SUBST

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSS ;
POSS ; 

LEXICON NLEX

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUMLEX

%<num%>: # ; 
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST ; 
%<num%>%<sim%>:%>%{A%}р SUBST ; 


LEXICON NPCOGMLEX

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPCOGFLEX

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPCOGMFLEX

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPANTMLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPANTFLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: CASE ; 



LEXICON NPTOPLEX

%<np%>%<top%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON ALEX

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} # ; 

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 
%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-S1 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2
!! кыска төрләнеш
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>к CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3-NO1SG

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;

V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-S4 ! Volition endings

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-FUT-IR
!! verbs that get -рга/-ргә ending should be also put here,             // CHECK
!! since in twol there is a rule deleting %{I%} after vowels
!! e.g. уйна-рга

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{I%}р POSS ;
%<inf%>:%>%{I%}рг%{A%} # ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{I%}р POSS ;

LEXICON V-FUT-AR

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{A%}р POSS ;
%<inf%>:%>%{A%}рг%{A%} # ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{A%}р POSS ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-FORMS

%<pres%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-S1 ; 
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ; 
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S3 ; 

LEXICON V-COMMON-LEX

V-FINITE-FORMS ; 

%<ger%>:%{U%} POSS ;
%<ger1%>:%>м%{A%}%{K%} POSS ; 
%<ger2%>:%>%{I%}п POSS ; 
%<ger3%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}ч POSS ; 
%<ger4%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нч%{I%} POSS ; 
%<ger5%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н POSS ;
%<ger7%>:%>%{A%}ч%{A%}к POSS ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{E%}с V-PERS-S4 ;
%<cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;

LEXICON V-COMMON-PASSIVE

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT-IR ; 

LEXICON V-NEG

%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 

V-COMMON-LEX ; 

LEXICON V-DER

%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-NEG ;
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-NEG ;

V-NEG ;

LEXICON V-IV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
V-COMMON-PASSIVE ;

LEXICON V-IV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
V-COMMON-PASSIVE ;

LEXICON VAUX

%<vaux%>: V-PERS-S2 ;

LEXICON PRNLEX-PERS

мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:мин # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:минем # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:миңа # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:мине # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:миндә # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:миннән # ; 

син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:син # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:синең # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:сиңа # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:сине # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:синдә # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:синнән # ; 

ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ул # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:аның # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңа # ;             !! also synonymic variants "аңар" and "аңарга" (only analysed)
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңар # ; Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңарга # ; Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:аны # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:анда # ;            !! also: "аңарда" (only analysed)  !!"анда" "аннан" usually instead of inanimate nouns 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:аңарда # ; Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:аннан # ;           !! also: "аңардан" (only analysed) !!"аңарда" "аңардан" -- instead of person
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:аңардан # ; Dir/LR

без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:без # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:безнең # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:безгә # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:безне # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:бездә # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:бездән # ; 

сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:сез # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:сезнең # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:сезгә # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:сезне # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:сездә # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:сездән # ; 

алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:алар # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:аларның # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:аларга # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:аларны # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:аларда # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:алардан # ; 

LEXICON PRNDEM-BU

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бу # ;           !! FIXME: these can get possessives too, e.g. монысының, монысына
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:моның # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:моңа # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:моны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:монда # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:моннан # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бо%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON PRNDEM-ŠUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:шул # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:шуның # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:шуңа # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:шуны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:шунда # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:шуннан # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:шул%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON PRNITGLEX

%<prn%>%<itg%>: POSS ; 

LEXICON PRNDEMLEX

%<prn%>%<dem%>: CASE ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ; 

LEXICON PRNREFLEX

%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS ; 


LEXICON DETINDLEX

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ; 


LEXICON DETDEMLEX

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETQNTLEX 

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ; 

LEXICON POSTLEX

%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON POSTADVLEX

%<postadv%>: # ; 


LEXICON ADVITGLEX

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADVLEX

%<adv%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON CCLEX

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CALEX

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 


LEXICON PREDLEX

%<pred%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON Nouns 
аш:аш NLEX ; ! ""
бит:бит NLEX ; ! ""
әдәбият:әдәбият NLEX ; ! ""
йодрык:йодрык NLEX ; ! ""
коточкыч:коточкыч NLEX ; ! ""
могҗиза:могҗиза NLEX ; ! ""
рух:рух NLEX ; ! "" 
текст:текст NLEX ; ! ""
усаллык:усаллык NLEX ; ! ""
чишү:чишү NLEX ; ! "" 
авария:авария NLEX ; ! ""
аэропорт:аэропорт NLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns
Казан:Казан NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
АКШ:АКШ NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Аурупа:Аурупа NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Петербур:Петербур NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Тын:Тын NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Идел:Идел NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Сибай:Сибай NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Учалы:Учалы NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Авыргазы:Авыргазы NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Балтика:Балтика NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Бүздәк:Бүздәк NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Гөлнара:Гөлнара NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Ирина:Ирина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Лилия:Лилия NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Айгөл:Айгөл NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Айзирә:Айзирә NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Алина:Алина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Алла:Алла NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Альбина:Альбина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Анна:Анна NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Әбҗәлил:Әбҗәлил NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Владимир:Владимир NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Евгений:Евгений NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Кирилл:Кирилл NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Марат:Марат NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Николай:Николай NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Рамил:Рамил NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Тимур:Тимур NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Айнур:Айнур NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Альберт:Альберт NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Борис:Борис NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Балабанов:Балабанов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Зубков:Зубков NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Исхаков:Исхаков NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Маврин:Маврин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Нәбиуллин:Нәбиуллин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Путин:Путин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Сәфиуллин:Сәфиуллин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Толкачев:Толкачев NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Хәмитов:Хәмитов NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Афонин:Афонин NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Башаров:Башаров NPCOGMLEX ; ! ""
Әүбәкирова:Әүбәкирова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Байкова:Байкова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Баталова:Баталова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Башкортова:Башкортова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Биишева:Биишева NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Бабич:Бабич NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Орджоникидзе:Орджоникидзе NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Семивеличенко:Семивеличенко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Adjectives 
кызыл:кызыл ALEX ; ! ""
шәп:шәп ALEX ; ! ""
иңле:иңле ALEX ; ! ""
эре:эре ALEX ; ! ""
көләч:көләч ALEX ; ! ""
хайвани:хайвани ALEX ; ! ""
катлаулы:катлаулы ALEX ; ! ""
намуслы:намуслы ALEX ; ! ""
үтерелгән:үтерелгән ALEX ; ! ""
балалы:балалы ALEX ; ! ""
актуаль:актуаль ALEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Adverbs 
кайда:кайда ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
кая:кая ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
кайчан:кайчан ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
ничек:ничек ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
ни% өчен:ни% өчен ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
әле:әле ADVLEX ; ! ""
аска:аска ADVLEX ; ! ""
кичә:кичә ADVLEX ; ! ""
соң:соң ADVLEX ; ! ""
аеруча:аеруча ADVLEX ; ! ""
бихисап:бихисап ADVLEX ; ! ""
җәмгысе:җәмгысе ADVLEX ; ! ""
диярлек:диярлек ADVLEX ; ! ""
әйтүләренчә:әйтүләренчә ADVLEX ; ! ""
бүгеннән:бүгеннән ADVLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs
бар:бар PREDLEX ; ! ""
юк:юк PREDLEX ; ! ""
йөр:йөр V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
йокла:йокла V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
күзәт:күзәт V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
яшерен:яшерен V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бас:бас V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
чык:чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кит:кит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
чык:чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
чап:чап V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
мен:мен V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
күн:күн V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
көлемсерә:көлемсерә V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
килеп% чык:килеп% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
хезмәт% ит:хезмәт% ит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
яра:яра V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ярдәм% ит:ярдәм% ит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кара:кара V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
карар% ит:карар% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
истә% тот:истә% тот V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
үт:үт V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
эч:эч V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тәкъдим% ит:тәкъдим% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
ярдәм% ит:ярдәм% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
бүләк% ит:бүләк% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
рөхсәт% ит:рөхсәт% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
өстә:өстә V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
карар% ит:карар% ит V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
тырыш:тырыш V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
булдыра% ал:булдыра% ал V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
сатып% ал:сатып% ал V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
таләп% ит:таләп% ит V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
озат:озат V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
багышлан:багышлан V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бүл:бүл V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
оештырыл:оештырыл V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
тап:тап V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
укы:укы V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
үткәрел:үткәрел V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ары:ары V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ашыр:ашыр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бар:бар V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
булдырыл:булдырыл V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
